Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.350

Packaged commodities in intrastate commerce—Declaration of contents on outside—Rules.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any commodity in package form introduced or delivered for introduction into or received in intrastate commerce, kept for the purpose of sale, offered or exposed for sale or sold in intrastate commerce, must bear on the outside of the package such definite, plain, and conspicuous declaration of:

(a) The identity of the commodity contained within the package unless the same can easily be identified through the package;

(b) The net quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure or count; and

(c) In the case of any package not sold on the premises where packed, the name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor, as may be prescribed by rule issued by the director.

(2) The declaration of weight, measure, or count required under subsection (1)(b) of this section, must not include or be associated with the qualifying term "when packed," any words of similar import, or any term qualifying a unit of weight, measure, or count (for example, "jumbo", "giant", "full", "or over", and the like) that tends to exaggerate the amount of commodity in a package.

(3) With respect to the declaration of weight, measure, or count required under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the director may by rule establish: (a) Reasonable variations to be allowed; (b) exemptions as to small packages; (c) exemptions as to commodities put up in variable weights or sizes for sale to the consumer intact and either customarily not sold as individual units or customarily weighed or measured at time of sale to the consumer; and (d) methods for checking the net contents of packaged goods.

[ 2019 c 96 s 12; 1992 c 237 s 25; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 16; 1969 c 67 s 35.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.